Delaware, session 153, HB155.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 5809, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 5809. State Public Integrity Commission â Power and duties. The powers and duties of the Commission shall be as follows: (11) To prepare an annual report by March 1st of each year describing its activities for the previous year and to prepare such other reports and studies as may advance the purposes of this chapter. Any report prepared by the Commission must be made available publicly on the Commissionâs website. Section 2. Amend Â§ 5814, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 5814. Retention of reports. (b) The reports filed pursuant to this subchapter shall be made available at reasonable hours for public inspection and copying pursuant to Chapter 100 of this title. (c) Reports filed under this subchapter must be made available to the public on the Commissionâs website. Section 3. This Act is effective on January 1 following its enactment into law. SYNOPSIS Like House Bill No. 155, this Act ensures that State Public Integrity Commission reports be made available to the public on the Commission's website. House Substitute 1 for HB 155 clarifies that reports filed with the State Public Integrity Commission, as well as those prepared by it, must be published on the Commissionâs website. This Act also changes the effective date of the Act to January 1 after its enactment into law.